Florida, session 2026, SB308.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 19 20 Section 1.âSection 267.07221, Florida Statutes, is created 21 to read: 22 267.07221âFlorida Museum of Black History Board of 23 Directors.â 24 (1)âIt is the intent of the Legislature to recognize the 25 work of the Florida Museum of Black History Task Force in 26 selecting a location for the Florida Museum of Black History and 27 designating St. Johns County as the site for the museum. It is 28 further the intent of the Legislature, under the authority 29 provided in s. 267.0722(7), to establish a board of directors to 30 oversee the commission, construction, operation, and 31 administration of the museum. 32 (2)(a)âThe Florida Museum of Black History Board of 33 Directors is established within the division and shall be 34 composed of the following members: 35 1.âThree individuals appointed by the Governor, one of whom 36 shall serve as chair. 37 2.âThree individuals appointed by the President of the 38 Senate. 39 3.âTwo members of the Senate, appointed by the President of 40 the Senate and serving ex officio, nonvoting. 41 4.âThree individuals appointed by the Speaker of the House 42 of Representatives. 43 5.âTwo members of the House of Representatives, appointed 44 by the Speaker of the House of Representatives and serving ex 45 officio, nonvoting. 46 (b)âAppointments must be made no later than July 31, 2026. 47 Members appointed pursuant to subparagraphs (a)1., 2., and 4. 48 may not hold any state or local elective office while serving on 49 the board. Vacancies on the board must be filled in the same 50 manner as the initial appointments. 51 (3)âThe board shall work jointly with the Foundation for 52 the Museum of Black History, Inc., a nonprofit organization 53 created to support the creation of the museum. 54 (4)âThe St. Johns County Board of County Commissioners 55 shall provide administrative assistance and staffing to the 56 board until the project planning, design, and engineering are 57 completed. 58 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.